Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-261
Home barber services permit; owner; liability.

The owner of a barber shop holding a home barber services permit shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the home barber services are provided in compliance with all applicable laws and rules and regulations and shall be liable for any violation which occurs.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 31.